Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2701
Public utilities; service outside city; authorization; limitation on length of contracts.

A city of the first or second class may enter into a contract or contracts to sell electric, water, or sewer service to persons beyond the corporate limits of such a city when, in the judgment of the mayor and council of such a city not having a board of public works or of its board of public works in such a city having such board, it is beneficial to any such city to do so. No such contract shall run for a period in excess of twenty-five years. Such a city is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into contracts for the furnishing of electric service to persons, firms, associations, and corporations beyond the corporate limits of such a city.

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 186;

R.S.1913, §§ 4959, 4960;

C.S.1922, §§ 4128, 4129;

Laws 1929, c. 43, § 2, p. 188;

C.S.1929, §§ 16-657, 16-658;

R.S.1943, § 16-685;

Laws 1947, c. 26, § 4, p. 130;

R.R.S.1943, § 16-685;

Laws 1957, c. 53, § 1, p. 262.

City was given power to contract for the sale of water outside the city limits. Burger v. City of Beatrice, 181 Neb. 213, 147 N.W.2d 784 (1967).

The provisions of this section were modified by legislative act creating the Nebraska Power Review Board. City of Auburn v. Eastern Nebraska Public Power Dist., 179 Neb. 439, 138 N.W.2d 629 (1965).